Massachusetts, session 194th, H30.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subdivision (1) of section 4 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out paragraph (p) and
inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
(p) For the purposes of this paragraph, the following words shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
“Non-public school”, an institution operated by a private entity in the commonwealth that
offers a special education program as approved by the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education; provided, that service in a non-public school shall not include activities in a residence
or afterschool program.
“School age child”, as defined in section 1 of chapter 71B.
“Special education”, as defined in section 1 of chapter 71B.
of 3

Any member of a contributory retirement system who is engaged in a teacher position
and holds a license issued by the department of elementary and secondary education or is
exempted from the requirement of licensure and who was previously employed as a teacher as
defined in section 1 in a special education program for school-aged children in a non-public
school, if the tuition of all pupils in said non-public school was financed in part or in full by the
commonwealth, may, before the date any retirement allowance becomes effective for the
member, establish such service as creditable service by depositing into the annuity savings fund
of the relevant system in 1 sum, or in installments, upon such terms and conditions as the board
may prescribe, an amount equal to that which would have been withheld as regular deductions
from regular compensation for such previous period, or most recent portion thereof, as the
member may elect, had such service been rendered in a public school of the commonwealth, plus
buyback interest to the date of such deposit for such previous period, or most recent portion
thereof, as the member may elect. Payment shall not be made and no credit shall be allowed for
such non-public school service in excess of the total service rendered in a public school of the
commonwealth to which the member would be entitled to receive credit if the member remained
in service to age 65, with the maximum credit for service in non-public schools not to exceed 10
years; provided, that no credit shall be allowed and no payment shall be accepted for any service
for which the member shall be entitled to receive a retirement allowance, annuity or pension
from any other source. Upon completion of such payments, the member shall receive the same
credit for such period of the member’s previous non-public school service or portion thereof
elected, as would have been allowed had such service been rendered by the member in a public
school of the commonwealth. The member shall furnish the board with such information as it
shall require to determine the amount to be paid and the credit to be allowed under this
of 3

paragraph. At the time a retirement allowance becomes due to a member or to a beneficiary
under option (d) of subdivision (2) of section 12, if the service rendered in public schools of the
commonwealth on the date either the retirement allowance becomes effective, or on the date the
member attained age 65, whichever occurs first, is less than the service in said non-public
schools for which the member has paid, credit shall be allowed only for the most recent service
rendered in said non-public schools equal to such service rendered in the public schools of the
commonwealth and the amount paid for such additional service shall be refunded with
accumulated interest, refund to be made only when the retirement allowance becomes due to the
member or to the beneficiary under option (d) of subdivision (2) of section 12, and if it is found
that payment has been accepted for any service for which the member is entitled to a retirement
allowance, annuity or pension from any other source, the amount paid for such service with
accumulated interest shall also be refunded with no retirement credit allowed.
of 3